Maine, session 132, LD370.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §4722, sub-§2, ¶C, as amended by PL 2019, c. 202, §1, is
further amended to read:
C. Mathematics--2 3 years or the equivalent in standards achievement;
Sec. 2. Department of Education to provide funding. The Department of
Education shall provide the necessary funding out of department funds to carry out the
purposes of section 1.